North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 7. Secretary of Revenue.

§ 147-87.
Secretary of Revenue; appointment; salary.

A Secretary of Revenue shall be appointed by the Governor on January 1, 1933, and quadrennially thereafter. The term of office of the Secretary shall be four years and until his successor is appointed and qualified. His salary shall be fixed by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act.

History.

1921, c. 40, ss. 2, 6; 1929, c. 232; 1973, c. 476, s. 193; 1983, c. 717, s. 90; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 164.

Cross References.

As to the Department of Revenue, see

G.S. 143B-217

et seq.

§ 147-88.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 10, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to preparation of reports concerning taxes by the Secretary of Revenue, see now

G.S. 105-256

.